District of Columbia statutes.
16-4420

Change of award by arbitrator.

(a)

On motion to an arbitrator by a party to an arbitration proceeding, the arbitrator may modify or correct an award:

(1)

Upon a ground stated in § 16-4424(a)(1) or (3);

(2)

Because the arbitrator has not made a final and definite award upon a claim submitted by the parties to the arbitration proceeding; or

(3)

To clarify the award.

(b)

A motion under subsection (a) of this section shall be made and notice given to all parties within 20 days after the movant receives notice of the award.

(c)

A party to the arbitration proceeding shall give notice of any objection to the motion within 10 days after receipt of the notice.

(d)

If a motion to the court is pending under § 16-4422, 16-4423, or 16-4424, the court may submit the claim to the arbitrator to consider whether to modify or correct the award:

(1)

Upon a ground stated in § 16-4424(a)(1) or (3);

(2)

Because the arbitrator has not made a final and definite award upon a claim submitted by the parties to the arbitration proceeding; or

(3)

To clarify the award.

(e)

An award modified or corrected pursuant to this section is subject to §§ 16-4419(a), 16-4422, 16-4423, and 16-4424.

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-111, § 2(b), 55 DCR 1847

History

This section is referenced in § 16-4404, § 16-4422, § 16-4423, and § 16-4424.

Section References

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 20 of the Uniform Arbitration Act (2000).

Editor's Notes